Utah statutes.
26A-1-102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board" means a local board of health established under Section 26A-1-109.

(2)  "County governing body" means one of the types of county government provided for in Title 17, Chapter 52, Part 5, Forms of County Government.

(3)  "County health department" means a local health department that serves a county and municipalities located within that county.

(4)  "Department" means the Department of Health created in Title 26, Chapter 1.

(5)  "Local health department" means a county or multicounty local health department established under this part.

(6)  "Multicounty local health department" means a local health department that serves two or more contiguous counties and municipalities within those counties.

